Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.281

Reports of violation—2009 c 120.

The director is authorized to regularly report violations of chapter 120, Laws of 2009, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry.

[ 2009 c 120 s 28.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.